test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-kv4_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  Noun - : # kv_
    fonn+N+Fem+Sg+Nom+Indef: fonn
    fonn+N+Fem+Sg+Acc+Indef: fonn
    fonn+N+Fem+Sg+Dat+Indef: fonn
    fonn+N+Fem+Sg+Gen+Indef: fannar
    fonn+N+Fem+Pl+Nom+Indef: fannir
    fonn+N+Fem+Pl+Dat+Indef: fonnum
    fonn+N+Fem+Pl+Gen+Indef: fanna
    fonn+N+Fem+Sg+Nom+Def: fonnin
    fonn+N+Fem+Sg+Acc+Def: fonnina
    fonn+N+Fem+Sg+Dat+Def: fonnini
    fonn+N+Fem+Sg+Gen+Def: fannarinnar
    fonn+N+Fem+Pl+Nom+Def: fannirnar
    fonn+N+Fem+Pl+Dat+Def: fonnunum
    fonn+N+Fem+Pl+Gen+Def: fannanna
